fst/nom_paradigms.lexc
! 31 — līgus (Adj)
LEXICON A31
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:līgin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:līgjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:līgei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:līgjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:līges  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:līgjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:ligī  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:līgins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:līgjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:liģāmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:ligjāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:līgin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:līgjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:līges  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:līgjas  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:līgun  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:līgusmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:līgwas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:ligwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:līgus  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:līguns  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:ligummans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:līgun  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:ligwāi  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:līgu  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:līgusmu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:līgwas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:ligwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:līgu  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:līguns  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:ligummans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:līgun  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:ligwāi  # ;

! 35a — interwallin (N)
LEXICON N35a
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:interwallin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:interwallan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:interwallu  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:interwallas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:interwallin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:interwallan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:interwallins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:interwallans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:interwallamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:interwalammans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:interwallin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:interwallan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:interwallai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:interwalāi  # ;

! 37 — pannin (N)
LEXICON N37
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:pannin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:pannjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:paņņu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:pannju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:pannes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:pannjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:pannin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:pannjan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:pannins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:pannjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:panemmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:panjammans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:pannin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:pannjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:panēi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:panjāi  # ;

! 37a — amzin (N)
LEXICON N37a
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:amzin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Neut:amzjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:amžu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Neut:amzju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:amžas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Neut:amzjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:amzin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Neut:amzjan  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:amzins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:amzjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:amžammans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:amzjammans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:amzin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Neut:amzjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:amžāi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Neut:amzjāi  # ;

! 40 — kūgis (N)
LEXICON N40
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:kūgin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:kūgjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:kūģu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:kūgju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:kūges  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:kūgjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:kūgis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:kūgins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:kūgjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:kūgemans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:kūgjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:kūgin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:kūgjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:kūgei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:kūgjai  # ;

! 40a — dulzis (N)
LEXICON N40a
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:dulzin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:dulzjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:dulžu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:dulzju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:dulžas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:dulzjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:dulzis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:dulzins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:dulzjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:dulžamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:dulzjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:dulzin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:dulzjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:dulžai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:dulzjai  # ;

! 40b — gīrbis (N)
LEXICON N40b
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:gīrbin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:gīrbjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:gīrbju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:gīrbjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:gīrbis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:gīrbins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:gīrbjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:gīrbjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:gīrbin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:gīrbjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:gīrbjai  # ;

! 40c — buccis (N)
LEXICON N40c
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:buccin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:buccjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:buccu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:buccju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:buccas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:buccjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:buccis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:buccins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:buccjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:buccamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:buccjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:buccin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:buccjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:buccai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:buccjai  # ;

! 41 — klākis (N)
LEXICON N41
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:klākin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:tlākjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:klāķu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:tlākju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:klākes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:tlākjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:klākis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Masc:tlākis  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:klākins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:tlākjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:klakemmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:tlakjammans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:klākin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:tlākjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:klakēi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:tlakjāi  # ;

! 46 — spigsnā (N)
LEXICON N46
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:spīgsnan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:spēgsnan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:spīgsnai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:spēgsnai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:spīgsnas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:spēgsnas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:spigsnā  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:spegsnā  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:spīgsnans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:spēgsnans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:spigsnāmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:spegsnāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:spīgsnan  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:spēgsnan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:spīgsnas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:spēgsnas  # ;

! 48 — galwā (N)
LEXICON N48
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:galwan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:galwai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:galwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:galwā  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:galwans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:galwāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:galwan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:galwas  # ;

! 49 — auktimmisku (N)
LEXICON N49
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:auktimmiskwan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:auktimmiskwai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:auktimmiskwas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:auktimmisku  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:auktimmiskwans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:auktimmiskwamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:auktimmiskwan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:auktimmiskwas  # ;

! 50 — garkīti (N)
LEXICON N50
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:garkītin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:garkītjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:garkītei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:garkītjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:garkītes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:garkītjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:garkīti  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:garkītins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:garkītjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:garkītemans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:garkītjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:garkītin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:garkītjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:garkītes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:garkītjas  # ;

! 50a — ķāsi (N)
LEXICON N50a
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:ķāsin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:kjāsjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:ķāšai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:kjāsjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:ķāšas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:kjāsjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:ķāsi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:kjāsi  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:ķāsins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:kjāsjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:ķāšamans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:kjāsjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:ķāsin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:kjāsjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:ķāšas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:kjāsjas  # ;

! 51 — martī (N)
LEXICON N51
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:mārtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:mārtjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:mārtei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:mārtjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:mārtes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:mārtjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:martī  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:mārtins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:mārtjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:marțāmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:martjāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:mārtin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:mārtjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:mārtes  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:mārtjas  # ;

! 51a — zansī (N)
LEXICON N51a
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:zānsin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:zānsjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:zānšai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:zānsjai  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:zānšas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:zānsjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:zansī  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:zānsins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:zānsjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:zanšāmans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:zansjāmans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:zānsin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:zānsjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:zānšas  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:zānsjas  # ;

! 54 — pekūri (N)
LEXICON N54
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:pekūrin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:pekārin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:pekūrei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:pekārei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:pekūres  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:pekāris  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:pekūri  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:pekāri  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:pekūrins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:pekārins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:pekūremans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:pekārimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:pekūrin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:pekārin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:pekūres  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:pekāris  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:pekūrin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Masc:pekārjan  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:pekūŗu  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Masc:pekārju  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:pekūres  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Masc:pekārjas  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:pekūris  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Masc:pekāris  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:pekūrins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:pekārjans  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:pekūremans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Masc:pekārjamans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:pekūrin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Masc:pekārjan  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:pekūrei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Masc:pekārjai  # ;

! 58 — klīts (N)
LEXICON N58
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:klītin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Akk+Fem:klētin  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:klītei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:klētei  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:klītis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Gen+Fem:klētis  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:klīts  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Nom+Fem:klēts  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:klītins  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:klētins  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:klītimans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Fem:klētimans  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:klītin  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Gen+Fem:klētin  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:klītis  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Nom+Fem:klētis  # ;

! 59 — kiŕksni (N)
LEXICON N59
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:kirksni  # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:kirksni  # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:kirksnis  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:kirksni  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:kirksni  # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:kirksni  # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:kirksnis  # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:kirksni  # ;
